Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0885.
peoplE of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. This act may be cited as the "parent and child legal representation act". Sec. 2. As used in this act: (a) "Commission" means the parent and child legal representation commission created in section 3. (b) "Consumer Price Index" means the most comprehensive index of consumer prices available for the Detroit-Warren-Dearborn area from the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of Labor. (c) "Office" means the office of parent and child legal representation created in section 5. Sec. 3. (1) The parent and child legal representation commission is created as an autonomous entity in the department of licensing and regulatory affairs. (2) The commission must consist of the following members appointed by the governor: (a) One individual from a list of 3 individuals submitted by the senate majority leader. (b) One individual from a list of 3 individuals submitted by the speaker of the house of representatives. (c) Two individuals from a list of 4 individuals submitted by the supreme court. (d) The director of the state budget office or the director's designated representative. (e) The director of the department of health and human services or the director's designated representative. (f) One individual who is an attorney licensed to practice law in this state and who has experience working as a prosecuting attorney from a list of 3 individuals submitted by the Prosecuting Attorneys Association of Michigan. (g) One individual recommended by the Children's Law Section of the State Bar of Michigan who is an attorney licensed to practice law in this state and who has experience as a parent attorney. (h) One individual recommended by the Children's Law Section of the State Bar of Michigan who is an attorney licensed to practice law in this state and who has experience as a child's attorney. (i) One individual recommended by the Children's Law Section of the State Bar of Michigan who is an attorney licensed to practice law in this state and who has experience as an appellate attorney. (j) One probate court judge from a list of 3 individuals submitted by the Michigan Probate Judges Association. (k) One circuit court judge from a list of 3 individuals submitted by the Michigan Judges Association. (l) One representative from a list of 3 individuals submitted by the Michigan Association of Counties. (m) One individual employed by or who represents a federally recognized Indian tribe and who is an attorney licensed to practice law in this state with experience in child welfare proceedings. (n) One member of the general public to represent the interests of individuals who have been impacted by the child welfare system. (3) The governor shall appoint the first members of the commission not later than 90 days after the effective date of this act. (4) The governor shall appoint 5 of the first members to 1-year terms, 5 of the first members to 2-year terms, and 5 of the first members to 3-year terms. After the first appointments, the term of a member of the commission is 4 years or until a successor is appointed under subsection (2). (5) If a vacancy occurs on the commission, the governor shall appoint an individual to fill the vacancy for the balance of the term. (6) The governor may remove a member of the commission for incompetence, dereliction of duty, malfeasance, misfeasance, or nonfeasance in office, or any other good cause. (7) The director of the department of licensing and regulatory affairs shall call the first meeting of the commission. At the first meeting, the commission shall elect a member as a chairperson and may elect other officers that it considers necessary or appropriate. The commission shall meet at least quarterly, or more frequently at the call of the chairperson or at the request of the majority of the members. (8) A majority of the members of the commission constitutes a quorum for transacting business. A vote in favor by the majority of the members of the commission serving is required for any action of the commission. (9) The commission shall conduct its business in compliance with the open meetings act, 1976 PA 267, MCL 15.261 to 15.275. (10) A writing that is prepared, owned, used, possessed, or retained by the commission in performing an official function is subject to the freedom of information act, 1976 PA 442, MCL 15.231 to 15.246. (11) A member of the commission is not entitled to compensation for service on the commission, but the commission may reimburse a member for actual and necessary expenses incurred in serving. Sec. 4. The commission shall do all of the following: (a) Create standards of practice for attorneys eligible for appointment by the office of parent and child legal representation. The standards must include, but are not limited to: (i) Establishing maximum caseloads to allow for quality representation. (ii) Establishing minimum training requirements to improve quality of legal representation for indigent children and parents in child welfare cases and appeals. (iii) Defining legal representation and nonlegal advocacy tasks that are eligible for payment by the office. (iv) Establishing minimum standards for frequency and format of attempted contact with clients. (b) Once the initial proposed standards are generated, the commission shall invite public comment on the standards and hold a public hearing to consider public comment. (c) Standards will only become effective when sufficient funding is appropriated, as determined by the commission. (d) Review the standards created under subdivision (a) periodically. Any proposed revisions to the standards must undergo the public comment process required for the initial standards and are not effective until sufficient funding is appropriated. (e) Establish a system to facilitate the appointment of counsel for indigent parents and children in child welfare cases that includes both of the following: (i) The opportunity for attorneys, firms, and organizations to apply for placement on a roster of attorneys eligible for appointment by the office. (ii) Incorporate the location of available attorneys and allow flexibility to accommodate varying needs across court systems. (f) Establish standards for determination of indigency that include both of the following: (i) That an individual is indigent when they are unable, without substantial financial hardship to the individual or the individual's dependents, to obtain competent, qualified legal representation. Factors that the court may consider include, but are not limited to, income or funds from employment or any other source, including personal public assistance, to which the respondent is entitled, property owned by the respondent or in which the individual has an economic interest, outstanding obligations, the number and ages of the individual's dependents, employment and job training history, and the individual's level of education. (ii) A rebuttable presumption of substantial financial hardship if the individual is any of the following: (A) Receiving personal public assistance including food assistance program, temporary assistance for needy families, Medicaid, or disability insurance, resides in public housing, or earns an income that is less than 140% of the federal poverty guideline. (B) Under the age of 18. (C) Currently serving a sentence in a correctional institution. (D) Currently receiving residential treatment in a mental health or substance abuse facility. (g) Establish a standardized rate of pay for appointed counsel and a process for payment of counsel that includes both of the following requirements: (i) Local funding units shall continue to contribute their local contribution equal to the local funding unit's average contribution to legal representation for child welfare cases over the prior 3 years. The local contribution must be adjusted annually by the rate of inflation as established by the Consumer Price Index. Local funding units must not be required to contribute more than the determined local contribution. (ii) A mechanism that allows the commission to secure additional funding from legislative appropriations. (h) Establish a process to provide experts to assist attorneys in their cases. The process must include receiving, evaluating, and approving requests for expert assistance, connecting attorneys with necessary experts, and providing funding necessary to retain expert assistance. (i) Establish a process to provide ancillary legal services to clients that might address underlying issues in their child protective proceeding. The process must include receiving, evaluating, and approving requests for ancillary legal services, connecting attorneys with necessary supports, and providing funding necessary to retain ancillary legal services. (j) Hire an executive director for the office. The executive director must be an attorney. (k) Determine appropriate staff for the office consistent with annual appropriations. (l) Identify and encourage best practices for delivering effective assistance of counsel to children and parents in child protective proceedings. Sec. 5. (1) The office of parent and child legal representation is created within the department of licensing and regulatory affairs. (2) The purpose of the office is to do all of the following: (a) Implement and oversee the system to facilitate the appointment of counsel at the trial and appellate levels for indigent parents and children in child protective proceedings once established by the commission. (b) Implement and oversee the process for payment of counsel once established by the commission. (c) Implement and oversee the process for providing experts to assist attorneys in cases once established by the commission. (d) Implement and oversee the process for providing ancillary legal services once established by the commission. (e) Provide technical assistance to support compliance with standards and best practices, once determined by commission. (f) Establish a process for routine performance reviews of attorneys on the roster to determine continued eligibility to serve on the roster. The process must include a mechanism for receipt and review of complaints related to an attorney's actions on appointed cases. (g) As approved by the commission, collect data regarding child protective legal representation statewide and provide an annual report to the governor, legislature, and supreme court. (3) The office may receive grants from governmental and nongovernmental sources. Enacting section 1. This act takes effect 90 days after the date it is enacted into law.